Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-711
Ground water management plan; Chief Water Officer; review; duties.

(1) The Chief Water Officer shall review any ground water management plan or plan modification submitted by a district to ensure that the best available studies, data, and information, whether previously existing or newly initiated, were utilized and considered and that such plan is supported by and is a reasonable application of such information. The Chief Water Officer shall consult with the Conservation and Survey Division of the University of Nebraska and such other state or federal agencies the Chief Water Officer shall deem necessary when reviewing plans. Within ninety days after receipt of a plan, the Chief Water Officer shall transmit his or her specific findings, conclusions, and reasons for approval or disapproval to the district submitting the plan.

(2) If the Chief Water Officer disapproves a ground water management plan, the district which submitted the plan shall, in order to establish a management area, submit to the Chief Water Officer either the original or a revised plan with an explanation of how the original or revised plan addresses the issues raised by the Chief Water Officer in his or her reasons for disapproval. Once a district has submitted an explanation pursuant to this section, such district may proceed to schedule a hearing pursuant to section 46-712.

Laws 1982, LB 375, § 5;

Laws 1986, LB 894, § 27;

Laws 1993, LB 3, § 12;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 46-673.03;

Laws 1996, LB 108, § 20;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 192;

R.S.Supp.,2002, § 46-656.14;

Laws 2004, LB 962, § 51;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 29;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 210.